District of Columbia statutes.
42-809

Conveyance or assurance by infant trustee or mortgagee under court order.

All and every such infant or infants, being only trustee or trustees, mortgagee or mortgagees, as aforesaid, shall and may be compelled by such order so, as aforesaid, to be obtained, to make such conveyance or conveyances, assurance or assurances, as aforesaid, in like manner as trustees or mortgagees of full age are compellable to convey or assign their trust, estates, or mortgages.

7 Anne, ch. 19, § 2, 1708
Kilty’s Rep. 247
Alex. Br. Stat. 680
Comp. Stat., D.C., p. 79, § 14
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(b) 49 DCR 2551
1981 Ed., § 45-709.
1973 Ed., § 45-609.
D.C. Law 14-132 revived this section as of November 6, 2001. This section had been previously repealed by D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).
Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) revival of section, see § 403(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).